District of Columbia statutes.
29-605.05

Power of legal representative of deceased partner.

If a partner dies, the deceased partner’s legal representative may exercise:

(1)

The rights of a transferee provided in § 29-605.03(c); and

(2)

For purposes of settling the estate, the rights the deceased partner had under § 29-604.06.

Mar. 5, 2013, D.C. Law 19-210, § 2(f)(5)(C), 59 DCR 13171
Application of Law 19-210: Section 7 of D.C. Law 19-210 provided that the act shall apply as of January 1, 2012.